Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 8
FOREIGN COOPERATIVES

Editor's note:

This article was repealed and reenacted in 1996, and this part 8 was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 2003, effective July 1, 2004, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 8 prior to 2004, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume and the editor's note following the article heading.

7-56-801. Authority to transact business or conduct activities required.

Part 8 of article 90 of this title, providing for the transaction of business or the conduct of activities by foreign entities, applies to foreign cooperatives.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2235, § 110, effective July 1, 2004.

7-56-802. Registered agent - service of process.

Part 7 of article 90 of this title, providing for registered agents and service of process, applies to foreign cooperatives.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2236, § 110, effective July 1, 2004.